Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-701
License; when required; issuance; revocation.

Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, no person, other than a parent, shall (1) place, (2) assist in placing, (3) advertise a child for placement, or (4) give the care and custody of any child to any person or association for adoption or otherwise, except for temporary or casual care, unless such person shall be duly licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services under such rules and regulations as the department shall prescribe. The department may grant or revoke such a license and make all needful rules regarding the issuance or revocation thereof.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. XI, § 1, p. 789;

C.S.1922, § 8265;

C.S.1929, § 71-2601;

R.S.1943, § 71-801;

Laws 1945, c. 170, § 1, p. 545;

Laws 1961, c. 204, § 5, p. 613;

Laws 1985, LB 255, § 35;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 175;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 70.

Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, see section 43-1501.